Louisiana, session 2026, HB507.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
8 Section 1. R.S. 30:1109(B) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 507 Original 2026 Regular Session McCormick
Abstract: Repeals the civil liability limits in an action against the owner or operator of a
storage facility, carbon dioxide transmission pipeline, or the generator of the carbon
dioxide being handled by either the facility or pipeline.
Present law provides that in a civil liability action against the owner or operator of a storage
facility, carbon dioxide transmission pipeline, or the generator of the carbon dioxide being
handled by either the facility or pipeline the maximum compensatory damages recoverable
for noneconomic loss cannot exceed $250,000 per person except for instances of wrongful
death or for permanent life-altering disfigurement or injury, which cannot exceed $500,000
per person.
Proposed law repeals the provisions of present law that limit the maximum compensatory
damages recoverable in a civil liability action against the owner or operator of a storage
facility, carbon dioxide transmission pipeline, or the generator of the carbon dioxide being
handled by either the facility or pipeline entirely.
(Repeals R.S. 30:1109(B))
Page 1 of 1